District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-306

Authorization of Board to carry out secondary purposes of subchapter.

Repealed.

History

June 4, 1948, 62 Stat. 340, ch. 418, § 6
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-113, § 2(1), 23 DCR 8742
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(o)(1), 27 DCR 1776
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(c), 41 DCR 4636
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(h)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-306.
1973 Ed., § 2-1706.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 8(h) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).

Transfer of Functions

Transfer of nonmilitary functions to Sports Commission: For temporary amendment of D.C. Law 10-152, authorizing the Armory Board to exercise its nonmilitary functions and authority on an interim basis, see § 2 of the Armory Board Interim Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-325, October 14, 1994, 41 DCR 7027) and § 2 of the Armory Board Interim Authority Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-5, January 19, 1995, 42 DCR 545).